Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 5. Radioactive Waste.

§ 10.1-1430.
Authority of Governor to enter into agreements with federal government; effect on federal licenses.

The Governor is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government providing for discontinuance of the federal government’s responsibilities with respect to low-level radioactive waste and the assumption thereof by the Commonwealth.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-283; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1431.
Authority of Board to enter into agreements with federal government, other states or interstate agencies; training programs for personnel.

The Board, with the prior approval of the Governor, is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government, other states or interstate agencies, whereby the Commonwealth will perform, on a cooperative basis with the federal government, other states or interstate agencies, inspections or other functions relating to control of low-level radioactive waste.

The Board may institute programs to train personnel to carry out the provisions of this article and, with the prior approval of the Governor, may make such personnel available for participation in any program of the federal government, other states or interstate agencies in furtherance of this chapter.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-284; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1432.
Further powers of Board.

The Board shall have the power, subject to the approval of the Governor:

To acquire by purchase, exercise the right of eminent domain as provided in Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1 grant, gift, devise or otherwise, the fee simple title to or any acceptable lesser interest in any lands, selected in the discretion of the Board as constituting necessary, desirable or acceptable sites for low-level radioactive waste management, including lands adjacent to a project site as in the discretion of the Board may be necessary or suitable for restricted areas. In all instances lands that are to be designated as radioactive waste material sites shall be acquired in fee simple absolute and dedicated in perpetuity to such purpose;

To convey or lease, for such term as in the discretion of the Board may be in the public interest, any lands so acquired, either for a fair and reasonable consideration or solely or partly as an inducement to the establishment or location in the Commonwealth of any scientific or technological facility, project, satellite project or nuclear storage area; but subject to such restraints as may be deemed proper to bring about a reversion of title or termination of any lease if the grantee or lessee ceases to use the premises or facilities in the conduct of business or activities consistent with the purposes of this article. However, radioactive waste material sites may be leased but may not otherwise be disposed of except to another department, agency or institution of the Commonwealth or to the United States;

To assume responsibility for perpetual custody and maintenance of radioactive waste held for custodial purposes at any publicly or privately operated facility located within the Commonwealth if the parties operating such facilities abandon their responsibility and whenever the federal government or any of its agencies has not assumed the responsibility. In such event, the Board may collect fees from private or public parties holding radioactive waste for perpetual custodial purposes in order to finance such perpetual custody and maintenance as the Board may undertake. The fees shall be sufficient in each individual case to defray the estimated cost of the Board’s custodial management activities for that individual case. All such fees, when received by the Board, shall be credited to a special fund of the Department, shall be used exclusively for maintenance costs or for otherwise satisfying custodial and maintenance obligations; and

To enter into an agreement with the federal government or any of its authorized agencies to assume perpetual maintenance of lands donated, leased, or purchased from the federal government or any of its authorized agencies and used as custodial sites for radioactive waste.

History.

1986, c. 492, § 10-285; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 940.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 940, in subdivision 1, substituted “Chapter 2 (§

25.1-200

et seq.) of Title 25.1” for “Chapter 1.1 (§ 25-46.1 et seq.) of Title 25” in the first sentence, and substituted “that” for “which” in the last sentence.